Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5208.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Cat" means a domestic cat of any age of the species Felis catus or a hybrid of that species. Cat includes, but is not limited to, a savannah cat, Serengeti cat, Maine coon, Bengal cat, or chausie. (b) "Therapeutic purpose" means a physical medical condition of a cat, including, but not limited to, an existing or recurring illness, infection, disease, injury, or abnormal condition in the claw of a cat that compromises the cat's health. Therapeutic purpose does not include a cosmetic or aesthetic reason or reason of convenience in keeping or handling a cat. Sec. 3. (1) An individual shall not perform by any means an onychectomy, a partial or complete phalangectomy, or tendonectomy procedure, or any other surgical procedure that prevents normal functioning of the claws, toes, or paws, on a cat, unless the procedure is necessary to address a therapeutic purpose. (2) An individual who violates this section is subject to a civil fine as follows: (a) For a first violation, a civil fine of not more than $2,500.00. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, a civil fine of not more than $5,000.00. (3) A violation of this section may be prosecuted by the prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred, or by the attorney general.